Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-238
Amendments proposed by the Legislature; special election; how conducted.

All pertinent provisions of the Election Act and of Chapter 49, article 2, pertaining to elections, including publication of notice, form of ballot, and canvassing of returns, shall be applicable to special state elections called pursuant to sections 49-235 to 49-238. The Secretary of State may call county canvassing boards and the board of state canvassers into special sessions to canvass votes cast pursuant to such sections. The Secretary of State may take all necessary action to implement such sections.

Laws 1969, c. 260, § 4, p. 1003;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 566.

Election Act, see section 32-101.